Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1298.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.56, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Prohibited actions; penalty. (a) Unless authorized by permit under section 17.457, subdivision 3, a person may not possess or release feral swine or otherwise allow feral swine to run at large. (b) A person may not hunt or trap feral swine, except as authorized new text begin under section 97B.655 or as authorized new text end by the commissioner for feral swine control or eradication. It is not a violation of this section if a person shoots a feral swine and reports the taking to the commissioner within 24 hours. All feral swine taken in this manner must be surrendered to the commissioner. (c) A person who violates this subdivision is guilty of a misdemeanor. (d) A person who violates this subdivision is liable for the actual costs incurred by the state for the possession or release of the feral swine. (e) A person who violates this subdivision is liable for the damages caused by the possession or release of the feral swine. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.655, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Owners and occupants may take certain animals. (a) A person or the person's agent may take bats, snakes, salamanders, lizards, weasel, mink, squirrel, rabbit, hare, raccoon, bobcat, fox, opossum, muskrat, new text begin feral swine as defined in section 97A.56, new text end or beaver on land owned or occupied by the person where the animal is causing damage. The person or the person's agent may take the animal without a license and in any manner except by artificial lights in the closed season or by poison. Raccoons may be taken under this subdivision with artificial lights during open season. (b) Any traps used under this subdivision must be tagged as required under section 97B.928 if placed by an agent of the landowner or occupant. (c) A person or the person's agent who kills mink, raccoon, bobcat, fox, opossum, muskrat, or beaver under this subdivision must notify a conservation officer or employee of the Fish and Wildlife Division within 24 hours after the animal is killed.new text begin A person or the person's agent who kills feral swine under this subdivision must notify a conservation officer or employee of the Fish and Wildlife Division within 48 hours after the animal is killed but is not required to surrender the swine to the commissioner.new text end